Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 3. Designations of Official Mississippi Scenic Byways.

§ 65-41-51.
“Grand Gulf-Raymond Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Grand Gulf-Raymond Scenic Byway,” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

Beginning at the Grand Gulf Military Monument on the Mississippi River then east along the historic Back Grand Gulf Road to Frasier Road, following east along Frasier Road to Y-Camp Road, following east along Y-Camp Road to Ingleside-Karnac Ferry Road through the community of Ingleside to Highway 61, then the route continues one-half (1/2) mile north of Highway 61, eastward along Willows Road to the community of Willows, then northeastward along the Old Port Gibson Road terminating at the Raymond Military Park at the City of Raymond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 12, 2004.).

§ 65-41-53.
“Lower Mississippi Historic Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads and streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Lower Mississippi Historic Scenic Byway,” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

Begin on U.S. Highway 61 at the Issaquena County line and travel south along U.S. Highway 61 in Warren County, to Business 61 (North Washington Street); travel north on Washington Street to downtown Vicksburg. Continue traveling on Washington Street as it merges into Warrington Road; travel Warrington Road to U.S. Highway 61; continue on U.S. Highway 61 South to Claiborne County.

Upon entering Claiborne County, continue traveling south on U.S. Highway 61. At Grand Gulf Road, travel west to Grand Gulf Military Park. Turn on Grand Gulf Road to U.S. Highway 61. Travel south on U.S. Highway 61 to Port Gibson. U.S. Highway 61 at Port Gibson is also known as “Church Street.” At the intersection of Church Street and Orange Street, travel west on Orange Street, past the Claiborne County Courthouse to Market Street. Travel south on Market Street four (4) blocks, past Mississippi Cultural Crossroads, Matt Ross Administrative Building, Harriette Pearson Memorial Library and Meyer Marx Building until you reach Carroll Street. Return to Church Street and travel south on U.S. Highway 61 to Jefferson County. This corridor also includes Rodney Road, which is Carroll Street (west of Market Street). Travel west on Rodney Road, past the Shaifer House and grounds; travel past the Ruins of Windsor where Rodney Road merges into Highway 552. Travel past Alcorn State University on Highway 552 back to U.S. Highway 61.

Travel south on U.S. Highway 61 until you reach Adams County and continue on U.S. Highway 61 through the City of Natchez to U.S. Highway 61/84 Interchange; travel west on U.S. Highway 84 to the Natchez Intermodal Center at the Mississippi River Bridge. Return to U.S. Highway 61/84 interchange and travel south on U.S. Highway 61 through the southern portion of Natchez to Wilkinson County. Traveling south on U.S. Highway 61 through Woodville to the Louisiana state line. This terminates the Lower Mississippi Historic Byway.

Outdoor advertising as identified in the Lower Mississippi Historic Byway Corridor Management Plan shall be allowed on U.S. Highway 61 and U.S. Highway 84 within the corporate limits of the impacted municipalities along the byway subject to the zoning and signage statutes and ordinances of the state and the impacted municipalities. Outdoor advertising outside of a municipality’s corporate limit must be in compliance with applicable local, state and federal guidelines.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 544, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 13, 2004.).

§ 65-41-55.
“Mississippi Delta Great River Road Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Mississippi Delta Great River Road Scenic Byway,” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

Begin at the Tennessee state line and travel south on U.S. Highway 61 to the intersection of Mississippi Highway 161. Continue on Mississippi Highway 161 to the Town of Walls, Mississippi, and travel south on Old Highway 61 through DeSoto County and Tunica County to the intersection with U.S. Highway 49 near Lula, Mississippi.Continue northwest on U.S. Highway 49 to the intersection with Mississippi Highway 1, and travel south along Mississippi Highway 1.Continue south along Mississippi Highway 1 through Coahoma County, Bolivar County, Washington County, east along Mississippi Highway 1 at Sharkey County and then south along Mississippi Highway 1 at Issaquena County.Continue on Mississippi Highway 1 south to the intersection of U.S. Highway 61 at Mississippi Highway 1 at Onward; continue south along U.S. Highway 61 to the Issaquena/Warren County line.This terminates the “Mississippi Delta Great River Road Scenic Byway.”

Outdoor advertising as identified in the Mississippi Delta Great River Road Scenic Byway Corridor Management Plan shall be allowed on Mississippi Highway 1 and U.S. Highway 61 within the corporate limits of the impacted municipalities along the byway subject to the zoning and signage statutes and ordinances of the state and the impacted municipalities. Outdoor advertising outside of a municipality’s corporate limit must be in compliance with applicable local, state and federal guidelines.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 578, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2009.).

§ 65-41-57.
“Biloxi-D’Iberville Scenic Expressway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Biloxi-D’Iberville Scenic Expressway” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq. as it reaches completion:

Beginning at the intersection of Highway 67 and Interstate I-10 and travel northerly along Highway 67 to the intersection of Highway 67 and U.S. Highway 49.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 541, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 65-41-59.
“Highway 605 Tradition Scenic Parkway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Highway 605 Tradition Scenic Parkway” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq. as it reaches completion:

Beginning at the intersection of Highway 605 and U.S. Highway 90 and travel northerly along Highway 605 to the intersection of Highway 605 and Highway 67.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 483, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 14, 2008.).

§ 65-41-61.
“Beach Boulevard Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Beach Boulevard Scenic Byway” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

Beginning at Cedar Point in Hancock County and traveling southerly along the coastline to Bayou Cadet in Hancock County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 317, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 3, 2011.).

§ 65-41-63.
“Scenic Byways to Space” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Scenic Byways to Space” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

To be known as “NASA Scenic Byway to Space”:Beginning at the intersection of the 4-lane portion of Mississippi Highway 607 with Mississippi Highway 604 and continuing northerly on Mississippi Highway 607 to the south gate of Stennis Space Center as well as exiting the north gate of Stennis Space Center on Mississippi Highway 607 to the edge of Texas Flat Road.

To be known as “Pearlington Scenic Byway to Space”: Beginning at the intersection of the 2-lane portion of U.S. Highway 90 with Mississippi Highway 607 and continuing southwesterly on U.S. Highway 90 to the edge of the buffer zone near the Town of Pearlington.

To be known as “Westonia Scenic Byway to Space”: Beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 604 with Mississippi Highway 607 and continuing southerly on Mississippi Highway 604 to the edge of the buffer zone near the Town of Pearlington.

To be known as “Logtown Scenic Byway to Space”: Beginning at the intersection of Logtown Road with Mississippi Highway 604 and continuing westerly on Logtown Road to the extinct Town of Logtown on the East Pearl River.

To be known as “Napoleon Scenic Byway to Space”: Beginning at the intersection of Old Mississippi Highway 43 and Mississippi Highway 607 north of Interstate 10 and continuing southerly to the south gate of Stennis Space Center, and including a small portion of road that comes off of Old Highway 43 and goes into the heart of what was once the Town of Napoleon.

To be known as “Santa Rosa Scenic Byway to Space”: Beginning at the intersection of Texas Flat Road with Mississippi Highway 607 and continuing east on Texas Flat Road to the edge of the buffer zone next to the runway of Stennis International Airport.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 317, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 3, 2011.).

§ 65-41-65.
“Brice’s Crossroads Battlefield-Chief Tishomingo Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Brice’s Crossroads Battlefield-Chief Tishomingo Scenic Byway” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

Beginning at the Brice’s Crossroads Visitors and Interpretive Center and traveling northerly on Grisham Street to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 370, then traveling westerly on Mississippi Highway 370 to its intersection with County Road 833, then traveling southeasterly on County Road 833 to its intersection with County Road 503, then traveling intersection with County Road 503, then traveling southerly on County Road 503 to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 348, then traveling easterly onMississippi Highway 348 to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 145.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 3, 2011.).

§ 65-41-67.
“Noxubee Hills Route” Scenic Byway designated.

The following highways and roads located in Choctaw, Winston and Noxubee Counties in Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Noxubee Hills Route” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

The Noxubee Hills Route begins at the intersection of the Choctaw Lake Road with Mississippi Highway 15 in the SE 1/4, S4, T16N, R1lE, Choctaw County, Mississippi, and runs in an easterly and northeasterly direction along the said Choctaw Lake Road to cross the dam of Choctaw Lake, located in the Tombigbee National Forest, to the intersection with the Webster Road in the Northeast 1/4, of S2, T16N, R1lE, Choctaw County. Thence, the route runs in an easterly direction along the Choctaw Lake Road to intersect the Choctaw/Winston County line near the Northwest corner of S6, T16N, R12E, in Winston County where the route becomes known as the Gumbranch-Ackerman Road in Winston County. Thence, the route runs in a southeasterly direction along the Gumbranch-Ackerman Road to intersect the Sturgis Road in the West 1/2 of S15, T16N, R12E, in Winston County. Thence, the route runs in a southeasterly direction along the Gumbranch-Hwy 25 Road to an intersection with Mississippi Hwy 25 at or near the Northwest corner of S28, T16N, R13E, in Winston County. Thence, the route runs in an easterly and northeasterly direction along the Bluff Lake Road to the Winston/Noxubee County line on the West line of S6, T16N, R15E, in Noxubee County. Thence, the route runs in an easterly direction along a Noxubee County route (CR-234) to intersect with the Levee (CR-267) and Bluff Lake (CR-266) Roads near the West line of S4, T16N, R15E, in Noxubee County and in the Sam D. Hamilton Noxubee National Wildlife Refuge. Thence, the route runs in a southerly direction along the Bluff Lake Road (CR-266) to intersect the Lynn Creek Road (CR-223) at or near the North line of S21, T16N, R15E, in Noxubee County. Thence, the route runs in an easterly direction along Lynn Creek Road (CR-223) to ultimately intersect US Hwy 45 in Brooksville, Mississippi, at or near the Northeast corner of S20, T16N, R17E, in Noxubee County, Mississippi. The Noxubee Hills Route runs approximately forty three (43) miles and serves parts of Choctaw, Winston, and Noxubee Counties in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-41-69.
“Delta Bluffs Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated in the following four (4) segments as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Delta Bluffs Scenic Byway” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.:

Northern Branch: Beginning at the intersection of Austin Road and Mississippi Highway 301 and continuing westward to the intersection of Delta View Road and Austin Road; then north along Delta View Road to the Great River Road National Scenic Byway (connectivity through the Town of Walls via Delta View Road, U.S. Highway 161 and 2nd Street);

Central Branch: Beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 301 and Austin Road and continuing south along Mississippi Highway 301 to Arkabutla Lake;

East-West Branch: Beginning at the intersection of Old Mississippi Highway 304 and Interstate 55 in Hernando and continuing westward to Bluff Road; and

Robertson Gin Road Extension Branch: Beginning at the intersection of U.S. Highway 51 and Commerce Street in DeSoto County and continuing south along U.S. Highway 51 to Oak Grove Road; thence westward on Oak Grove Road to Robinson Gin Road; then south along Robinson Gin Road to Wheeler Road; thence westward along Wheeler Road to its point of terminus at Hernando Point at Arkabutla Lake.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 337, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 442, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2015).

§ 65-41-71.
“Gateway to History” scenic byway designated.

The following highways located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic byway to be known as the “Gateway to History,” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972:

Segment 1: Beginning at the intersection of Highway 463 and Reunion Parkway and traveling north along Highway 463 for four and eight-tenths (4.8) miles to the intersection of Highway 22.

Segment 2: Begin at the corner of Highway 463 and Highway 22 and continue west for eight and seven-tenths (8.7) miles to the Petrified Forest in the Town of Flora.

Segment 3: Begin at the corner of Highway 463 and Highway 22 and continue east for twelve and three-tenths (12.3) miles to the City of Canton. The roadway changes to four-lane for one and four-tenths (1.4) miles surrounding the I-55 Canton interchange which is excluded and resumes for one and four-tenths (1.4) miles to the City of Canton.

Segment 4: Begin at the intersection of Highway 51 and Highway 22 in Canton and travel for one and seven-tenths (1.7) miles. At the intersection of Highway 16 (Highway 22 becomes Highway 16) turn right on Highway 43 and travel for six and seven-tenths (6.7) miles to the Natchez Trace.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2013).

§ 65-41-73.
“William Faulkner Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “William Faulkner Scenic Byway” pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.: Beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 30 and County Road 14 in Union County and continuing westerly along Mississippi Highway 30 to its intersection with County Road 229 in Lafayette County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2015).

§ 65-41-75.
“Gulf Coast Scenic Byway” designated.

The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the “Gulf Coast Scenic Byway” pursuant to Section 65-45-1 et seq.:

U.S. Highway 90 beginning at the intersection of U.S. Highway 90 and Beach Boulevard in Bay St. Louis continuing for 19 miles and ending at the intersection of DeBuys Road and U.S. Highway 90; connecting with the existing Beach Boulevard Scenic Byway designated in Section 65-41-61.

Outdoor advertising shall be allowed on the following portions of U.S. Highway 90 within the corporate limits of the impacted municipalities subject to the zoning and signage ordinances of the impacted municipalities: the end of the Bay St. Louis Bridge to Fort Henry Street; Church Avenue to Fleitas Avenue in Pass Christian; White Harbor Road to Marcie Drive in Long Beach; Russell Avenue to South Nicholson Avenue in Long Beach; Camp Avenue to Pratt Avenue in Gulfport; and Courthouse Road to Paradise Avenue in Gulfport.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.